Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2143.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9778. Animal abuse list.(a) Maintenance and posting.--Beginning January 1, 2027, the Pennsylvania State Police shall maintain and post a list on a publicly accessible Internet website that includes individuals convicted on or after the effective date of this subsection of an animal abuse offense.(b) Identifying information.--(1) The list shall include a photograph taken of the individual convicted of an animal abuse offense as part of the booking process, the individual's full legal name and other identifying data as the Pennsylvania State Police 123456789101112131415161718 determines is necessary to properly identify the individual and to exclude innocent individuals.(2) The list shall not include the individual's Social Security number, driver's license number or any other Federal or State identification number.(c) Judgment.--A clerk of court shall forward a copy of the judgment and date of birth of an individual convicted of an animal abuse offense to the Pennsylvania State Police within 60 calendar days of the date of the judgment.(d) Timing and removal.--(1) Upon an individual's first conviction for an animal abuse offense, the Pennsylvania State Police shall maintain the individual's name and other identifying information, as described under subsection (b), on the list for two years following the date of conviction, after which time the Pennsylvania State Police shall remove the individual's name and identifying information from the list if the individual is not convicted of another animal abuse offense during that two-year period.(2) Upon an individual's subsequent conviction for an animal abuse offense, the Pennsylvania State Police shall maintain the individual's name and other identifying information, as described under subsection (b), on the list for five years following the date of the most recent conviction, after which time the Pennsylvania State Police shall remove the individual's name and identifying information from the list if the individual is not convicted of another animal abuse offense during that five-year period.(e) Expungement.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall remove an individual's name and identifying information from the list 20260HB2143PN2768 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if the offense for which the individual is included on the list is expunged.(f) Regulations.--The Pennsylvania State Police may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this section.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Animal." A companion animal or non-livestock animal."Animal abuse offense." An offense under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 55 Subch. B (relating to cruelty to animals)."Companion animal." A dog or cat."Conviction." A judgment entered by a court upon a plea of guilty, a plea of nolo contendere or a finding of guilt by a jury or the court, notwithstanding any pending appeal or habeas corpus proceeding arising from the judgment."List." The list maintained and posted by the Pennsylvania State Police under subsection (a).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2143PN2768 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819